Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1449HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 167 Section 1. Section 256.160, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. âGrooming behaviorâ means any behavior, which in light 3 of all relevant circumstances, constitutes actions to entice 4 or entrap a student or students with the intent to make such 5 student or students engage in a sex act the process of building 6 trust and emotional connections with a student with the intent 7 to exploit such student . 8